North Dakota, session 69, HB1132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Whole pasteurized milk served in bulk milk dispensers - Available in schools .
As used in this section "bulk milk" has the same meaning provided in section 4.1 - 26 - 01 .
Notwithstanding chapters 4.1 - 05, 4.1 - 25, 4.1 - 26, 19 - 02.1, and 23 - 09 and title 64, a board of a schoo l
district or a not-for-profit nonpublic school approved by the superintendent of public instruction may
establish a policy allowing a school within the school district to serve whole, two percent, and flavored
pasteurized milk through a bulk milk dispenser.

H. B. NO. 1132 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1132.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 0 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State